Wisconsin, session 2025, SB658.
do enact as follows:SB658,11Section 1. 76.633 of the statutes is created to read:SB658,2,3276.633 Community development entity investment credit. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB658,2,54(a) “Applicable percentage” means 0 percent for the first 2 credit allowance 5dates and 10 percent for the next 5 credit allowance dates.SB658,2,76(b) “CDFI fund” means the community development financial institutions 7fund of the U.S. treasury department.SB658,3,21(c) “Credit allowance date” means, with respect to any qualified equity 2investment, any of the following dates:SB658,3,331. The date on which the investment is initially made.SB658,3,442. Each of the 6 anniversary dates of that date thereafter.SB658,3,65(d) “Metro county” means Columbia, Dane, Green, Iowa, Milwaukee, Ozaukee, 6Washington, and Waukesha Counties.SB658,3,97(e) 1. “Principal business operations” means the place or places where at least 860 percent of a qualified active low-income community business’s employees work or 9where employees that are paid at least 60 percent of the business’s payroll work.SB658,3,15102. “Principal business operations” includes places where an out-of-state 11business agrees to relocate employees or an in-state business agrees to hire 12employees using the proceeds of a qualified low-income community investment 13when the business satisfies the definition under subd. 1. within 180 days, or by a 14later date agreed by the department, after receiving the qualified low-income 15community investment.SB658,3,1716(f) “Purchase price” means the amount paid to a qualified community 17development entity for a qualified equity investment.SB658,4,318(g) 1. “Qualified active low-income community business” has the meaning 19given in section 45D (d) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code except as provided in subd. 202. “Qualified active low-income community business” includes a business for the 21duration that it receives a qualified low-income community investment if the 22qualified community development entity reasonably expects at the time that it 23makes the qualified low-income community investment in the business that the 24business will continue to continue to be considered a qualified active low-income 1community business under section 45D (d) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code 2throughout the entire period that it receives the qualified low-income community 3investment.SB658,4,1042. “Qualified active low-income community business” does not include a 5business that derives or projects to derive 15 percent or more of its annual income 6from the rental or sale of real estate. This subdivision does not apply to a business 7that is controlled by or under common control with another business if the 2nd 8business does not derive or project to derive 15 percent or more of its annual income 9from the rental or sale of real estate and is the primary tenant of the real estate 10leased from the initial business.SB658,4,1611(h) “Qualified community development entity” has the meaning given in 12section 45D (c) of the Internal Revenue Code but includes only entities that have 13entered into, or that are controlled by an entity that has entered into, an allocation 14agreement with the CDFI fund with respect to tax credits authorized under section 1545D of the Internal Revenue Code that includes this state within the service area 16set forth in that allocation agreement.SB658,4,1817(i) “Qualified equity investment” means any equity investment in a qualified 18community development entity to which all of the following apply:SB658,4,19191. Either of the following applies:SB658,4,2120a. The equity investment is acquired after December 31, 2024, at its original 21issuance solely in exchange for cash.SB658,4,2422b. The equity investment is acquired by an insurer and a prior holder of the 23equity investment acquired it after December 31, 2024, at its original issuance 24solely in exchange for cash.SB658,5,412. The qualified community development entity uses at least 100 percent of 2the purchase price of the equity investment to make qualified low-income 3community investments in qualified active low-income community businesses that 4have their principal business operations in this state.SB658,5,653. The equity investment is designated by the community development entity 6as a qualified equity investment under sub. (5).SB658,5,1174. If the qualified community development entity is not domiciled in this state 8and the entity’s controlling entity, if any, is not domiciled in this state, the qualified 9community development entity has designated at least 50 percent of the equity 10investment as a qualified equity investment under section 45D of the Internal 11Revenue Code.SB658,5,13125. The equity investment is certified by the department as not exceeding the 13limit under sub. (4) (a).SB658,5,1514(j) “Qualified low-income community investment” means any capital or equity 15investment in, or loan to, a qualified active low-income community business.SB658,5,1616(k) “Rural county” means any county in this state that is not a metro county.SB658,5,2217(2) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, an 18insurer may claim as a credit against the fees due under s. 76.60, 76.63, 76.65, 1976.66, or 76.67, for a taxable year in which the insurer holds a qualified equity 20investment on its the allowance date, an amount equal to the applicable percentage 21for that allowance date multiplied by the purchase price paid to the qualified 22community development entity for the qualified equity investment.SB658,6,423(3) Carry-forward. If the credit under sub. (2) is not entirely offset against 24the fees under s. 76.60, 76.63, 76.65, 76.66, or 76.67 otherwise due, the unused 1balance may be carried forward and credited against those fees for following years 2to the extent that it is not offset by those fees otherwise due in all the years between 3the year in which the qualified entity investment was held on its allowance date and 4the year in which the carry-forward credit is claimed.SB658,6,85(4) Allocations; applications. (a) 1. The department shall allocate 6$125,000,000 in qualified equity investment authority for the credit under this 7section for investment in qualified active low-income community businesses having 8principal business operations in a rural county.SB658,6,1292. The department shall allocate $125,000,000 in qualified equity investment 10authority for the credit under this section for investment in qualified active low-11income community businesses having principal business operations in a metro 12county.SB658,6,1713(b) 1. A qualified community development entity that seeks to have an equity 14investment designated as a qualified equity investment that is eligible for the credit 15under this section shall apply to the department for the rural allocation under par. 16(a) 1. or the metro allocation under par. (a) 2. or both on a form provided by the 17department and shall include all of the following:SB658,6,2018a. The name, address, and tax identification number of the applicant and 19evidence of the applicant’s certification as a qualified community development 20entity by the CDFI fund.SB658,6,2221b. A copy of the allocation agreement executed by the applicant or its 22controlling entity and the CDFI fund.SB658,7,223c. A certificate executed by an executive officer of the applicant attesting that 1the allocation agreement with the CDFI fund remains in effect and has not been 2revoked or cancelled.SB658,7,43d. A description of the proposed amount, structure, and purchaser of the 4equity investment.SB658,7,105e. The amount of qualified equity investment authority applied for from the 6rural allocation or the metro allocation, or both, as applicable. If the applicant is 7not domiciled in this state, the amount applied for under this paragraph may not 8exceed an amount equal to twice the amount of qualified equity investment 9authority under section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code available to the 10applicant or its controlling entity.SB658,7,1311f. If the applicant is not domiciled in this state, evidence of the amount of 12qualified equity investment authority under section 45D of the Internal Revenue 13Code available to the applicant or its controlling entity.SB658,7,1414g. A nonrefundable application fee of $5,000 paid to the department.SB658,7,17152. A qualified community development entity may apply for a portion of both 16the rural allocation under par. (a) 1. and the metro allocation under par. (a) 2. of 17qualified equity investment authority.SB658,7,21183. The department shall establish a date for beginning to accept applications 19under this paragraph that is not less than 30 days but no more than 45 days after 20the U.S. treasury department announces allocation awards for the CDFI fund for 21the round of funding set forth in 89 Fed. Reg. 99283 to 99292 (November 21, 2024).SB658,8,922(5) Certification of qualified equity investments. (a) No later than 30 23days after receiving an application under sub. (4) (b), the department shall approve 24or deny the application in full or in part. If the department denies any part of the 1application, the department shall inform the applicant of the grounds for the 2denial. If the applicant provides any additional information required by the 3department or otherwise amends its application within 15 days of the notice of 4denial, the department shall consider the application complete as of the original 5date of submission. If the applicant fails to provide the information or complete its 6application within 15 days of the notice of denial, the application remains denied 7and if the applicant submits an additional application, the department may not 8consider the additional application complete as of the date of submission of the 9original application.SB658,8,1310(b) 1. If the department determines that an application is complete, the 11department shall certify the equity investment proposed by the application as a 12qualified equity investment that is eligible for the credit under this section, subject 13to the limitations under this subsection.SB658,8,15142. The department shall provide written notice of a certification under subd. 151. to the applicant.SB658,8,20163. When a qualified community development entity certified under subd. 1. 17knows the names of the persons who are allocated a credit under this section and 18the respective credit amounts for each person, the qualified community 19development entity shall provide to the department a notice containing the names 20and credit amounts.SB658,8,23214. The department shall provide a certification containing the credit amounts 22and utilization schedule to each person and qualified community development 23entity described in subd. 3.SB658,9,2245. If the person eligible to claim a credit under this section changes because of 1a transfer of a qualified equity investment, the qualified community development 2entity shall notify the department of the change. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb658 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb658 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB658 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB658 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB658: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting